Hawaii statutes.
§11-184 Election expenses and
responsibilities in combined state and county elections. Election expenses
in elections involving both state and county offices shall be shared as set
forth below:

(1) The State shall pay and be responsible for:

(A) Precinct officials;

(B) Instruction of precinct officials when
initiated or approved by the chief election officer;

(C) Boards of registration;

(D) Polling place costs other than supplies:
installation rentals, ballot boxes, voting booths, custodians, telephones, and
maintenance;

(E) Other equipment such as ballot transport
containers;

(F) Temporary election employees hired to do
strictly state work; and

(G) Extraordinary voter registration and
voter education costs when approved by the chief election officer.

(2) The county shall pay and be responsible for:

(A) Normal voter registration, voters list
maintenance, and all printing connected with voter registration, including
printing of the voters list;

(B) Temporary election employees hired to do
strictly county work;

(C) Maintenance of existing voting machines,
including parts, freight, storage, programming, and personnel;

(D) Maintenance and storage of voting devices
and other equipment; and

(E) Employees assigned to conduct absentee
polling place functions.

(3) The remaining election expenses shall be divided
in half between the State and the counties. Each county will pay a proration
of expenses as a proportion of the registered voters at the time of the general
election. These expenses shall include but not be limited to:

(A) Polling place supplies;

(B) All printing, including ballots, but
excluding printing connected with voter registration;

(C) Temporary election employees not
including voting machine programmers doing work for both the State and county;

(D) Ballot preparation and packing; and

(E) All other costs for which the State or
county are not specifically responsible relating to the operation of voting
machines, electronic voting systems, and other voting systems except paper
ballots to include but not be limited to real property rentals, equipment
rentals, personnel, mileage, telephones, supplies, publicity, computer
programming, and freight.

The responsibility for the above
functions shall be determined by the chief election officer where the
responsibility for such functions has not been assigned by the legislature.

Any future expenses not presently incurred
under any voting system now in use or to be used shall be assigned to
paragraphs (1), (2), or (3) above by the chief election officer upon agreement
with the clerks or by the legislature. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c
217, §1(eee); am L 1976, c 106, §1(10)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next